test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-moonnad_gt-norm.yaml
Config:              
  hfst:            
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst         
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst         
  xerox:            
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst         
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst         
    App: lookup         
              
              
              
              
Tests:              
              
# todo:             
# Proofread the gold standard (below)         
# Then: run analyser, then correct.         
              
              
  Verb - moonnâđ: # Verb 'to go' - full paradigm   
     moonnâđ+V+Inf: moonnâđ        
     moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: moonâm      mõõnam  
     moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: moonah      mõõnak  
     moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mana      mâânn  
     moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: manneen        
     moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: monâvettee        
     moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: moonnâv        
     moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: moonnâp      mõõnnâp  
     moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: monâvetteđ      mõõnnveˊted  
     moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: maneh      mâˊnne  
     moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+4:       mõõnât  
     moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: moonâ      mõõn  
     moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: moonnim      mõˊnnem  
     moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: moonnih      mõˊnniǩ  
     moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: moonâi      mõõni  
     moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: moonáim        
     moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: moonáid        
     moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: moonáin        
     moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: moonâim      mõõnim  
     moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: moonâid      mõõnid  
     moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: monnii      mõˊnne  
     moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+4:       mõˊnneš  
     moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: moonnnâm      mõõnnâm  
     moonnâđ+V+Pot+Sg1: maaneem      mõõnžem  
     moonnâđ+V+Pot+Sg2: maaneeh      mõõnžiǩ  
     moonnâđ+V+Pot+Sg3: [moonâš, moonâž]     mõõnâž  
     moonnâđ+V+Pot+Du1: monâžeen        
     moonnâđ+V+Pot+Du2: [moonâšvettee, moonâžvettee)       
     moonnâđ+V+Pot+Du3: monâžává        
     moonnâđ+V+Pot+Pl1: monâžep      [mõõnžin, mõõnžim, mõõnžep]
     moonnâđ+V+Pot+Pl2: [moonâšvetteđ, moonâžvetteđ)     mõõnžid  
     moonnâđ+V+Pot+Pl3: [monâžeh, moonâžeh]     mõõnže  
     moonnâđ+V+Pot+4:       mõõnžet  
     moonnâđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: moonii      mõõnže  
     moonnâđ+V+Cond+Sg1: monâččim      mõõnčem  
     moonnâđ+V+Cond+Sg2: monâččih      mõõnčiǩ  
     moonnâđ+V+Cond+Sg3: [monâččij, moonâčij]     mõõnči  
     moonnâđ+V+Cond+Du1: monâččáim        
     moonnâđ+V+Cond+Du2: monâččáid        
     moonnâđ+V+Cond+Du3: monâčáin        
     moonnâđ+V+Cond+Pl1: monâččijm      [mõõnčep, mõõnčim, mõõnčin]
     moonnâđ+V+Cond+Pl2: monâččijd      mõõnčid  
     moonnâđ+V+Cond+Pl3: monâččii      mõõnče  
     moonnâđ+V+Cond+4:       mõõnčeš  
     moonnâđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: monâččii      mõõnče  
     moonnâđ+V+Imp+Sg2: moonâ      mõõn  
     moonnâđ+V+Imp+Sg3: maṇos      mâânas  
     moonnâđ+V+Imp+Du1: mannoon        
     moonnâđ+V+Imp+Du2: mannee        
     moonnâđ+V+Imp+Du3: mannoos        
     moonnâđ+V+Imp+Pl1: mannoop      mõõnnâp  
     moonnâđ+V+Imp+Pl2: moonnâđ      moonnâđ  
     moonnâđ+V+Imp+Pl3: mannoos      mânnaz  
     moonnâđ+V+Imp+ConNeg: moonâ      mõnnu  
     moonnâđ+V+PrsPrc: mannee      mõõnni  
     moonnâđ+V+PrfPrc: moonnâm      mõõnnâm  
     moonnâđ+V+Action: moonnâm      mõõnnâm  
     moonnâđ+V+ActEss: monâmin      mõõnnmen  
     moonnâđ+V+ActLoc: monâmist        
     moonnâđ+V+VAbess: monâhánnáá      [mõõnǩeânai, mõõnkâni, mõõnkani]
              
     moonnâđ+V+Pass+PrfPrc:   moonnum    mõnnum  
              
     moonnâđ+V+GerTemp: monâdijn      mõõneen  
     moonnâđ+V+GerInstr: monâmáin      mõõneeˊl  
     moonnâđ+V+VGen: moonân        
